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DI−48 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

DTC C 1210 / 36 Zero Point Calibration of Yaw Rate
Sensor Undone

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1210 /36

When any of following 1. through 2. is detected:
1. After battery terminal was connected, when the shift

leverwasmovedother than toPrangewithin15sec.
soonafterECUterminal IG1becomeONfor the first
time.

2. When the yaw rate sensor zero point recorded in ECU is
deleted.

SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit

SNeutral start switchcircuit (P range)

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkwhetherzeropointcalibrationofyawratesensorhasbeendoneornot.

PREPARATION:
Shift theshift lever inPrangeand turn the ignitionswitchON, repeatconnectingandreleasingTsandE

1
terminals of check connector 4 times or more for 8 sec. After that do not move the vehicle for 15 sec. or more.
CHECK:
Check that the”VSC TRC” warning light and ”VSC OFF” indicator light up for 15 sec.

YES No problem.

NO

DI6XB−01
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2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between neutral start
switch (P range) and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and engine and ECT ECU (See
page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate
sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

4 Check yaw rate sensor (See page DI−62).

NG Replace yaw rate sensor.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


